Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-369.02
Safety rating; factors; notice.

Following a compliance review of an intrastate motor carrier by an officer of the Nebraska State Patrol carrier enforcement division, the Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a safety rating of that motor carrier. The safety rating shall be based upon factors prescribed in 49 C.F.R. part 385 — Safety Fitness Procedures adopted in section 75-363, portions of 49 C.F.R. chapter I adopted in section 75-364, and insurance requirements for intrastate motor carriers set forth by the Public Service Commission pursuant to section 75-307. The motor carrier shall be notified by the Nebraska State Patrol of such safety rating by certified or registered mail.

Laws 1994, LB 358, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 19.